Utah statutes.
75-7-111.   Rules of construction.

The rules of construction that apply to the interpretation of and disposition of property by will or other governing instrument, as defined in Section 75-1-201, also apply as appropriate to the interpretation of the terms of a trust and the disposition of the trust property.



Enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

